Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1552.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-101. Definitions In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including ethanol, methanol, propynol and isopropynol. 2. "Alcohol concentration" if expressed as a percentage means either: (a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood. (b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath. 3. "All-terrain vehicle" means either of the following: (a) A motor vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is fifty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of one thousand two hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on three or more nonhighway tires. (v) Is operated on a public highway. (b) A recreational off-highway vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is eighty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of two thousand five hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on four or more nonhighway tires. (v) Has a steering wheel for steering control. (vi) Has a rollover protective structure. (vii) Has an occupant retention system. 4. "apply" and "application" means the process in which a person provides required information in a manner PReSCRIBED by the department for services RENDERED by the department. 4. 5. "Authorized emergency vehicle" means any of the following: (a) A fire department vehicle. (b) A police vehicle. (c) An ambulance or emergency vehicle of a municipal department or public service corporation that is designated or authorized by the department or a local authority. (d) Any other ambulance, fire truck or rescue vehicle that is authorized by the department in its sole discretion and that meets liability insurance requirements prescribed by the department. 5. 6. "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle on which the driver and passengers ride in a fully or partially enclosed seating area that is equipped with a roll cage, safety belts for each occupant and antilock brakes and that is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals. 6. 7. "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain. 7. 8. "Automotive recycler" means a person that is engaged in the business of buying or acquiring a motor vehicle solely for the purpose of dismantling, selling or otherwise disposing of the parts or accessories and that removes parts for resale from six or more vehicles in a calendar year. 8. 9. "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system. 9. 10. "Aviation fuel" means all flammable liquids composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating an internal combustion engine for use in an aircraft but does not include fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft. 10. 11. "Bicycle" means a device, including a racing wheelchair, that is propelled by human power and on which a person may ride and that has either: (a) Two tandem wheels, either of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. (b) Three wheels in contact with the ground, any of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. 11. 12. "Board" means the transportation board. 12. 13. "Bus" means a motor vehicle designed for carrying sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. 13. 14. "Business district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway if there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes within any six hundred feet along the highway, including hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings that occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of the highway. 14. 15. "Certificate of ownership" means a paper or an electronic record that is issued in another state or a foreign jurisdiction and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 15. 16. "Certificate of title" means a paper document or an electronic record that is issued by the department and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 16. 17. "Combination of vehicles" means a truck or truck tractor and semitrailer and any trailer that it tows but does not include a forklift designed for the purpose of loading or unloading the truck, trailer or semitrailer. 17. 18. "Controlled substance" means a substance so classified under section 102(6) of the controlled substances act (21 United States Code section 802(6)) and includes all substances listed in schedules I through V of 21 Code of Federal Regulations part 1308. 18. 19. "Conviction" means: (a) An unvacated adjudication of guilt or a determination that a person violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal. (b) An unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's appearance in court. (c) A plea of guilty or no contest accepted by the court. (d) The payment of a fine or court costs. 19. 20. "County highway" means a public road that is constructed and maintained by a county. 20. 21. "Dealer" means a person who is engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers and who has an established place of business and has paid fees pursuant to section 28-4302. 21. 22. "Department" means the department of transportation acting directly or through its duly authorized officers and agents. 22. 23. "Digital network or software application" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 23. 24. "Director" means the director of the department of transportation. 24. 25. "Drive" means to operate or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle. 25. 26. "Driver" means a person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle. 26. 27. "Driver license" means a license that is issued by a state to an individual and that authorizes the individual to drive a motor vehicle. 27. 28. "Dynamic driving task": (a) Means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic. (b) Includes: (i) Lateral vehicle motion control by steering. (ii) Longitudinal motion control by acceleration and deceleration. (iii) Monitoring the driving environment by object and event detection, recognition, classification and response preparation. (iv) Object and event response execution. (v) Maneuver planning. (vi) Enhancing conspicuity by lighting, signaling and gesturing. (c) Does not include strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selecting destinations and waypoints. 28. 29. "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts and that meets the requirements of one of the following classes: (a) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (b) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle or tricycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (c) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. 29. 30. "Electric miniature scooter" means a device that: (a) Weighs less than thirty pounds. (b) Has two or three wheels. (c) Has handlebars. (d) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (e) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (f) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed ten miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. 30. 31. "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing device with one wheel or two nontandem wheels and an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen miles per hour or less and that is designed to transport only one person. 31. 32. "Electric standup scooter": (a) Means a device that: (i) Weighs less than seventy-five pounds. (ii) Has two or three wheels. (iii) Has handlebars. (iv) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (v) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (vi) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed twenty miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. (b) Does not include an electric miniature scooter. 32. 33. "Evidence" includes both of the following: (a) A display on a wireless communication device of a department-generated driver license, nonoperating identification license, vehicle registration card or other official record of the department that is presented to a law enforcement officer or in a court or an administrative proceeding. (b) An electronic or digital license plate authorized pursuant to section 28-364. 33. 34. "Farm" means any lands primarily used for agriculture production. 34. 35. "Farm tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing implements of husbandry. 35. 36. "Foreign vehicle" means a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer that is brought into this state other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer and that has not been registered in this state. 36. 37. "Fully autonomous vehicle" means an autonomous vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level four or five system under SAE J3016 and that may be designed to function either: (a) Solely by use of the automated driving system. (b) By a human driver when the automated driving system is not engaged. 37. 38. "Golf cart" means a motor vehicle that has not less than three wheels in contact with the ground, that has an unladen weight of less than one thousand eight hundred pounds, that is designed to be and is operated at not more than twenty-five miles per hour and that is designed to carry not more than four persons including the driver. 38. 39. "Gross combined weight rating" means the sum of the gross vehicle weight rating of a motor vehicle and the trailer or semitrailer the motor vehicle tows. 39. 40. "Gross vehicle weight rating" means the weight that is assigned by the motor vehicle manufacturer to a motor vehicle and that represents the maximum recommended total weight, including the vehicle and the load for the vehicle. 40. 41. "Hazardous material" means a material, and its mixtures or solutions, that the United States department of transportation determines under 49 Code of Federal Regulations is, or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin under 42 Code of Federal Regulations part 73 that is, capable of posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety and property if transported in commerce and that is required to be placarded or marked as required by the department's safety rules prescribed pursuant to chapter 14 of this title. 41. 42. "Human driver" means a natural person in the vehicle who performs in real time all or part of the dynamic driving task or who achieves a minimal risk condition for the vehicle. 42. 43. "Implement of husbandry" means a vehicle that is designed primarily for agricultural purposes and that is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations, including an implement or vehicle that uses an automated driving system or that is autonomous or that is self-propelled or otherwise, whether operated manually, equipped with an automated driving system that is not in use or equipped with an automated driving system that is in use, and that meets both of the following conditions: (a) Is used solely for agricultural purposes, including the preparation or harvesting of cotton, alfalfa, grains, specialty crops and other farm crops. For the purposes of this subdivision, "specialty crops" includes fruits, vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits and horticulture and nursery crops, including floriculture. (b) Is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway whether as a trailer or an autonomous vehicle or a self-propelled unit. For the purposes of this subdivision, "incidentally operated or moved on a highway" means travel between a farm and another part of the same farm, from one farm to another farm or between a farm and a place of repair, supply or storage. 43. 44. "Limousine" means a motor vehicle providing prearranged ground transportation service for an individual passenger, or a group of passengers, that is arranged in advance or is operated on a regular route or between specified points and includes ground transportation under a contract or agreement for services that includes a fixed rate or time and is provided in a motor vehicle with a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. 44. 45. "Livery vehicle" means a motor vehicle that: (a) Has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. (b) Provides passenger services for a fare determined by a flat rate or flat hourly rate between geographic zones or within a geographic area. (c) Is available for hire on an exclusive or shared ride basis. (d) May do any of the following: (i) Operate on a regular route or between specified places. (ii) Offer prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141. (iii) Offer on demand ground transportation service pursuant to a contract with a public airport, licensed business entity or organization. 45. 46. "Local authority" means any county, municipal or other local board or body exercising jurisdiction over highways under the constitution and laws of this state. 46. 47. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers. 47. 48. "Minimal risk condition": (a) Means a condition to which a human driver or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed. (b) Includes bringing the vehicle to a complete stop. 48. 49. "Moped" means a bicycle, not including an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter, that is equipped with a helper motor if the vehicle has a maximum piston displacement of fifty cubic centimeters or less, a brake horsepower of one and one-half or less and a maximum speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less on a flat surface with less than a one percent grade. 49. 50. "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle that has a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and that is designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground but excludes a tractor, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter and a moped. 50. 51. "Motor driven cycle" means a motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor that produces not more than five horsepower but does not include an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter. 51. 52. "Motorized quadricycle" means a self-propelled motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is self-propelled by an emission-free electric motor and may include pedals operated by the passengers. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle seats at least eight passengers, including the driver. (d) The vehicle is operable on a flat surface using solely the electric motor without assistance from the pedals or passengers. (e) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (f) The vehicle is a limousine operating under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (g) The vehicle is manufactured by a motor vehicle manufacturer that is licensed pursuant to chapter 10 of this title. (h) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 52. 53. "Motor vehicle": (a) Means either: (i) A self-propelled vehicle. (ii) For the purposes of the laws relating to the imposition of a tax on motor vehicle fuel, a vehicle that is operated on the highways of this state and that is propelled by the use of motor vehicle fuel. (b) Does not include a scrap vehicle, a personal delivery device, a personal mobile cargo carrying device, a motorized wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter or a motorized skateboard. For the purposes of this subdivision: (i) "Motorized skateboard" means a self-propelled device that does not have handlebars and that has a motor, a deck on which a person may ride and at least two tandem wheels in contact with the ground. (ii) "Motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 53. 54. "Motor vehicle fuel" includes all products that are commonly or commercially known or sold as gasoline, including casinghead gasoline, natural gasoline and all flammable liquids, and that are composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating internal combustion engines. Motor vehicle fuel does not include inflammable liquids that are specifically manufactured for racing motor vehicles and that are distributed for and used by racing motor vehicles at a racetrack, use fuel as defined in section 28-5601, aviation fuel, fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft or the mixture created at the interface of two different substances being transported through a pipeline, commonly known as transmix. 54. 55. "Neighborhood electric shuttle": (a) Means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (i) The vehicle is emission free. (ii) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (iii) The vehicle is capable of transporting at least eight passengers, including the driver. (iv) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (v) The vehicle is a vehicle for hire as defined in section 28-9501 and operates under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (vi) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. (b) Includes a vehicle that meets the standards prescribed in subdivision (a) of this paragraph and that has been modified after market and not by the manufacturer to transport up to fifteen passengers, including the driver. 55. 56. "Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is emission free. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles, unless excepted or exempted under federal law, set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 56. 57. "Neighborhood occupantless electric vehicle" means a neighborhood electric vehicle that is not designed, intended or marketed for human occupancy. 57. 58. "Nonresident" means a person who is not a resident of this state as defined in section 28-2001. 58. 59. "Off-road recreational motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel and that is not operated on a public highway. Off-road recreational motor vehicle does not mean a motor vehicle used for construction, building trade, mining or agricultural purposes. 59. 60. "Operational design domain": (a) Means operating conditions under which a given automated driving system is specifically designed to function. (b) Includes roadway types, speed range, environmental conditions, such as weather or time of day, and other domain constraints. 60. 61. "Operator" means a person who drives a motor vehicle on a highway, who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway or who is exercising control over or steering a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle. 61. 62. "Owner" means: (a) A person who holds the legal title of a vehicle. (b) If a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease with the right of purchase on performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, the conditional vendee or lessee. (c) If a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession of the vehicle, the mortgagor. 62. 63. "Pedestrian" means any person afoot. A person who uses an electric personal assistive mobility device or a manual or motorized wheelchair is considered a pedestrian unless the manual wheelchair qualifies as a bicycle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 63. 64. "Personal delivery device": (a) Means a device that is both of the following: (i) Manufactured for transporting cargo and goods in an area described in section 28-1225. (ii) Equipped with automated driving technology, including software and hardware, that enables the operation of the device with the remote support and supervision of a human. (b) Does not include a personal mobile cargo carrying device. 64. 65. "Personal mobile cargo carrying device" means an electronically powered device that: (a) Is operated primarily on sidewalks and within crosswalks and that is designed to transport property. (b) Weighs less than eighty pounds, excluding cargo. (c) Operates at a maximum speed of twelve miles per hour. (d) Is equipped with technology to transport personal property with the active monitoring of a property owner and that is primarily designed to remain within twenty-five feet of the property owner. (e) Is equipped with a braking system that when active or engaged enables the personal mobile cargo carrying device to come to a controlled stop. 65. 66. "Power sweeper" means an implement, with or without motive power, that is only incidentally operated or moved on a street or highway and that is designed for the removal of debris, dirt, gravel, litter or sand whether by broom, vacuum or regenerative air system from asphaltic concrete or cement concrete surfaces, including parking lots, highways, streets and warehouses, and a vehicle on which the implement is permanently mounted. 66. 67. "Public transit" means the transportation of passengers on scheduled routes by means of a conveyance on an individual passenger fare-paying basis excluding transportation by a sightseeing bus, school bus or taxi or a vehicle not operated on a scheduled route basis. 67. 68. "Reconstructed vehicle" means a vehicle that has been assembled or constructed largely by means of essential parts, new or used, derived from vehicles or makes of vehicles of various names, models and types or that, if originally otherwise constructed, has been materially altered by the removal of essential parts or by the addition or substitution of essential parts, new or used, derived from other vehicles or makes of vehicles. For the purposes of this paragraph, "essential parts" means integral and body parts, the removal, alteration or substitution of which will tend to conceal the identity or substantially alter the appearance of the vehicle. 68. 69. "Residence district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district if the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. 69. 70. "Right-of-way" when used within the context of the regulation of the movement of traffic on a highway means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway. Right-of-way when used within the context of the real property on which transportation facilities and appurtenances to the facilities are constructed or maintained means the lands or interest in lands within the right-of-way boundaries. 70. 71. "SAE J3016" means surface transportation recommended practice J3016 taxonomy and definitions for terms related to driving automation systems for on-road motor vehicles published by SAE international in June 2018. 71. 72. "School bus" means a motor vehicle that is designed for carrying more than ten passengers and that is either: (a) Owned by any public or governmental agency or other institution and operated for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. (b) Privately owned and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. 72. 73. "Scrap metal dealer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 73. 74. "Scrap vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 74. 75. "Semitrailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that some part of its weight and that of its load rests on or is carried by another vehicle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 75. 76. "Single-axle tow dolly" means a nonvehicle device that is drawn by a motor vehicle, that is designed and used exclusively to transport another motor vehicle and on which the front or rear wheels of the drawn motor vehicle are mounted on the tow dolly while the other wheels of the drawn motor vehicle remain in contact with the ground. 76. 77. "State" means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia. 77. 78. "State highway" means a state route or portion of a state route that is accepted and designated by the board as a state highway and that is maintained by the state. 78. 79. "State route" means a right-of-way whether actually used as a highway or not that is designated by the board as a location for the construction of a state highway. 79. 80. "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way if a part of the way is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. 80. 81. "Taxi" means a motor vehicle that has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers, including the driver, that provides passenger services and that: (a) Does not primarily operate on a regular route or between specified places. (b) Offers local transportation for a fare determined on the basis of the distance traveled or prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141 for a predetermined fare. 81. 82. "Title transfer form" means a paper or an electronic form that is prescribed by the department for the purpose of transferring a certificate of title from one owner to another owner. 82. 83. "Traffic survival school" means a school that is licensed pursuant to chapter 8, article 7.1 of this title and that offers educational sessions that are designed to improve the safety and habits of drivers and that are approved by the department. 83. 84. "Trailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that no part of its weight rests on the towing vehicle. A semitrailer equipped with an auxiliary front axle commonly known as a dolly is deemed to be a trailer. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 84. 85. "Transportation network company" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 85. 86. "Transportation network company vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 86. 87. "Transportation network service" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 87. 88. "Truck" means a motor vehicle designed or used primarily for the carrying of property other than the effects of the driver or passengers and includes a motor vehicle to which has been added a box, a platform or other equipment for such carrying. 88. 89. "Truck tractor" means a motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and that is not constructed to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load drawn. 89. 90. "Vehicle": (a) Means a device in, on or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on a public highway. (b) Does not include: (i) Electric bicycles, electric miniature scooters, electric standup scooters and devices moved by human power. (ii) Devices used exclusively on stationary rails or tracks. (iii) Personal delivery devices. (iv) Scrap vehicles. (v) Personal mobile cargo carrying devices. 90. 91. "Vehicle transporter" means either: (a) A truck tractor capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. (b) A truck tractor with a stinger-steered fifth wheel capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer or a truck tractor with a dolly mounted fifth wheel that is securely fastened to the truck tractor at two or more points and that is capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-337, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-337. High occupancy vehicle lane; lane degradation; priority use A. In accordance with 23 United States Code section 166, the department shall develop procedures to monitor the impact that single occupancy vehicles authorized under sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01 have on the operation of the high occupancy vehicle lanes. B. If a high occupancy vehicle lane becomes degraded due to the authorization of single occupancy vehicles authorized under sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, use of the lane is restricted to the following vehicles in the following priority: 1. Passenger vehicles with two or more occupants, including the driver. 2. Public transit buses. 3. Buses with two or more occupants, including the driver. 4. Motorcycles. 5. Alternative fuel vehicles. 6. Low emission and energy efficient vehicles as defined in section 28-601. 7. Blood transport vehicles as defined in section 28-737. C. The department shall limit the use of the high occupancy vehicle lanes to vehicles in the priority order prescribed in subsection B of this section and shall maintain those restrictions while the lane or portion of the lane remains degraded. D. For the purposes of this section, a high occupancy vehicle lane is degraded if vehicles operating on the facility, or portions of the facility, are failing to maintain a speed of forty-five miles per hour or greater ninety per cent percent of the time over a consecutive one hundred eighty day eighty-day period during morning and evening weekday peak hour periods. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 28-737, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-737. High occupancy vehicle lanes; exceptions; civil penalty; definitions A. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01 and subsection B of this section, a person shall not drive a vehicle carrying fewer than two persons, including the driver, in a high occupancy vehicle lane at any time the use of the high occupancy vehicle lane is restricted to vehicles carrying two or more persons, including the driver. B. Subsection A of this section does not apply to any of the following: 1. During the performance of a tow truck operator's duties, a tow truck operator driving a tow truck. 2. A person driving a motorcycle. 3. A person driving a public transportation vehicle. 4. An authorized emergency vehicle as defined in section 28-101 that is in use by a first responder in the line of duty. 5. A blood transport vehicle if the vehicle displays on each side and on the rear of the vehicle a removable decal or sign indicating that the vehicle is transporting human blood or blood products. C. A person who violates subsection A of this section is subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars $200. D. Notwithstanding section 28-1554, one hundred dollars $100 of each civil penalty collected pursuant to subsection C of this section shall be deposited in the state general fund. E. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "blood transport vehicle" MEANS a motor vehicle that is owned or OPERATED by a nonprofit general blood banking OPERATION, a nonprofit blood bank or a nonprofit blood bank's agent and that is transporting blood or blood products between collection points, HOSPITALS or blood storage centers. 2. "Public transportation vehicle" means any vehicle that provides a public entity's public transportation service and either: 1. (a) Is owned or operated by the public entity. 2. (b) Is operated under a contract with the public entity.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 28-2351, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2351. License plate provided; design A. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall provide to every owner one license plate for each vehicle registered. At the request of the owner and on payment of a fee in an amount prescribed by the director by rule, the department shall provide one additional license plate for a vehicle for which a special plate is requested pursuant to this chapter. B. The license plate shall display the number assigned to the vehicle and to the owner of the vehicle and the name of this state, which may be abbreviated. The director shall coat the license plate with a reflective material that is consistent with the determination of the department regarding the color and design of license plates and special plates. The director shall design the license plate and the letters and numerals on the license plate to be of sufficient size to be plainly readable during daylight from a distance of one hundred feet. In addition to the standard license plate issued for a trailer before August 12, 2005, the director shall issue a license plate for trailers that has a design that is similar to the standard size license plate for trailers but that is the same size as the license plate for motorcycles. The trailer owner shall notify the department which size license plate the owner wants for the trailer. C. In addition to the requirements prescribed in subsection B of this section, for all license plates, including all special plates, that are designed or redesigned on or after September 24, 2022: 1. The background color of the license plate shall contrast significantly with the color of the letters and numerals on the license plate and with the name of this state on the license plate. 2. The name of this state shall appear on the license plate in capital letters in sans serif font and be three-fourths of an inch in height. D. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not contract with a nongovernmental entity to purchase or secure reflective material for the plates issued by the department unless the department has made a reasonable effort to secure qualified bids or proposals from as many individual responsible respondents as possible. E. The department shall determine the color and design of the license plate subject to the requirements prescribed by subsections B and C of this section. All plates issued by the department, except the plates that are issued pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2412, 28-2413, 28-2414, 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60, 28-2472, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, 28-2476, 28-2477, 28-2478 and 28-4533 and article 14 of this chapter, shall be the same color as and similar in design to the license plate as determined by the department. F. A passenger motor vehicle that is rented without a driver shall receive the same type of license plate as is issued for a private passenger motor vehicle.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 28-2403, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2403. Special plates; transfers; violation; classification A. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall issue or renew special plates in lieu of the regular license plates pursuant to the following conditions and procedures and only if the requirements prescribed by this article for the requested special plates are met: 1. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, a person who is the registered owner of a vehicle registered with the department or who applies for an original or renewal registration of a vehicle may submit to the department a completed application form as prescribed by the department with the fee prescribed by section 28-2402 for special plates in addition to the registration fee prescribed by section 28-2003. 2. Except for plates issued pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2412, 28-2413, 28-2414, 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60, 28-2472, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, and 28-2476, 28-2477 and 28-2478 and article 14 of this chapter, the special plates shall be the same color as and similar to the design of the regular license plates that is determined by the department. 3. Except as provided in section 28-2416, the department shall issue special plates only to the owner or lessee of a vehicle that is currently registered, including any vehicle that has a declared gross weight, as defined in section 28-5431, of twenty-six thousand pounds or less. 4. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, the department shall charge the fee prescribed by section 28-2402 for each annual renewal of special plates in addition to the registration fee prescribed by section 28-2003. B. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, on notification to the department and on payment of the transfer fee prescribed by section 28-2402, a person who is issued special plates may transfer the special plates to another vehicle the person owns or leases. Persons who are issued special plates for hearing impaired persons pursuant to section 28-2408 and international symbol of access special plates pursuant to section 28-2409 are exempt from the transfer fee. If a person who is issued special plates sells, trades or otherwise releases ownership of the vehicle on which the plates have been displayed, the person shall immediately report the transfer of the plates to the department or the person shall surrender the plates to the department as prescribed by the director. It is unlawful for a person to whom the plates have been issued to knowingly allow them to be displayed on a vehicle except the vehicle authorized by the department. C. The special plates shall be affixed to the vehicle for which registration is sought in lieu of the regular license plates. D. A person is guilty of a class 3 misdemeanor who: 1. Violates subsection B of this section. 2. Fraudulently gives false or fictitious information in the application for or renewal of special plates or placards issued pursuant to this article. 3. Conceals a material fact or otherwise commits fraud in the application for or renewal of special plates or placards issued pursuant to this article.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Repeal Section 28-2410, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 7. Title 28, chapter 7, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 28-2470.40, 28-2470.41, 28-2470.42, 28-2470.43, 28-2470.44, 28-2470.45, 28-2470.46, 28-2470.47, 28-2470.48, 28-2470.49, 28-2470.50, 28-2470.51, 28-2470.52, 28-2470.53, 28-2470.54, 28-2470.55, 28-2470.56, 28-2470.57, 28-2470.58, 28-2470.59 and 28-2470.60, to read: START_STATUTE28-2470.40. Skin cancer prevention special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue skin cancer prevention special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the skin cancer prevention special plates. The design and color of the skin cancer prevention special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for skin cancer prevention special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the skin cancer prevention special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the skin cancer prevention special plate fund established by this section. D. The skin cancer prevention special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state and been INCORPORATED in this state since 2011. 2. Provide skin cancer prevention education, preventative EXAMINATIONS, sun protection and HYGIENE products to promote skin cancer prevention awareness and education in this state, including: (a) at school resource fairs for low-income students and families. (b) to persons with physical disabilities and chronic illnesses, including persons with transportation barriers. (c) to persons living in shelters and affordable housing developments. (d) at churches. (e) at businesses. (f) for municipal entities. (g) at community events. 3. Arrange for the construction of permanent sun shade structures at schools, churches and community parks for protection from heat and from sun DAMAGE. 4. Have a mission to ORGANIZE volunteer medical professionals and medical residents and other community volunteers and medical school, COLLEGE and high school students to promote skin cancer prevention awareness and education at community events and to improve the quality of life in both urban and rural areas in this state. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.41. Diabetes awareness special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue diabetes awareness special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the diabetes awareness special plates. The design and color of the diabetes awareness special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for diabetes awareness special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the diabetes awareness special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the diabetes awareness special plate fund established by this section. D. The diabetes awareness special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have been founded in 2022 and be headquartered in this state. 2. Support persons who are living with diabetes and their families through a support NETWORK crafted by diabetics. 3. Provide education and resources to inform the general public about diabetes. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.42. Small business advocate special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue small business advocate special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the small business advocate special plates. The design and color of the small business advocate special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for small business advocate special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the small business advocate special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the small business advocate special plate fund established by this section. D. The small business advocate special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(6) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state. 2. Have been in existence for at least fifty years. 3. Serve as a statewide nonpartisan advocate and resource hub for small businesses in this state. 4. Provide education resources to entrepreneurs, including workshops, mentorship programs and events that are designed to provide relevant knowledge and skills. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.43. Recycling refurbished electronics special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. RESPONSIBLY collect ELECTRONIC waste located in this state. 2. Refurbish and distribute computing and communication devices to residents of this state. 3. Educate and provide workforce development. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.44. Adaptive sports and recreation special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue adaptive sports and recreation special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the adaptive sports and recreation special plates. The design and color of the adaptive sports and recreation special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for adaptive sports and recreation special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the adaptive sports and recreation special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the adaptive sports and recreation special plate fund established by this section. D. The adaptive sports and recreation special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have been founded in 2018. 2. provide adaptive equipment for water sports and train volunteers to assist persons with physical or cognitive disabilities regardless of age to access water sports throughout this state, including waterskiing, wakeboarding, wakesurfing, kayaking, fishing, boating and tubing. 3. Promote physical wellness, emotional healing and a sense of belonging. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.45. Blood and biologics special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue blood and biologics special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the blood and biologics special plates. The design and color of the blood and biologics special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for blood and biologics special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the blood and biologics special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the blood and biologics special plate fund established by this section. D. The blood and biologics special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Secure and steward charitable gifts to connect blood and biologics donors with recipients. 2. Use financial contributions and gifts to improve lives by providing essential blood products, clinical services, medical consultation and innovative research. 3. Engage with sponsors for community blood drives and mobile bloodmobiles. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.46. Astronomy center special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue astronomy center special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the astronomy center special plates. The design and color of the astronomy center special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for astronomy center special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the astronomy center special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the astronomy center special plate fund established by this section. D. The astronomy center special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be governed by an independent board of trustees. 2. Manage long-term endowment goals or short-term targeted donations for An observatory that pursues the study of astronomy in this state. 3. Support the work of an astronomy observatory located in the Flagstaff area. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.47. Law enforcement charity organization special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue law enforcement charity organization special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the law enforcement charity organization special plates. The design and color of the law enforcement charity organization special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for law enforcement charity organization special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the law enforcement charity organization special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the law enforcement charity organization special plate fund established by this section. D. The law enforcement charity organization special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. support law ENFORCEMENT officers who serve in a city with a population of more than one million persons. 2. Provide employee assistance, benevolence assistance and scholarships to members of law enforcement. 3. create a cycle of support that benefits both law enforcement and the broader community. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.48. Law enforcement support special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue law enforcement support special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the law enforcement support special plates. The design and color of the law enforcement support special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for law enforcement support special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the law enforcement support special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the law enforcement support special plate fund established by this section. D. The law enforcement support special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection A of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Collect and distribute donations to families of fallen or injured law enforcement officers in this state through a memorial fund. 2. Fundraise for support of law enforcement operational units, including canine and mounted units. 3. Engage in community fundraising and events, including annual toy drives, commemorative merchandise and car wash fundraisers. 4. For new membership in the entity, require sponsorship by a current member. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.49. Search and rescue special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue search and rescue special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the search and rescue special plates. The design and color of the search and rescue special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for search and rescue special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the search and rescue special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the search and rescue special plate fund established by this section. D. The search and rescue special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have been established in the 1980s. 2. Support arizona sheriffs in fulfilling the sheriff's statutory search and rescue RESPONSIBILITIES. 3. Develop training standards, ENHANCE search techniques and PROMOTE consistency AMONG search and rescue volunteers, county coordinators and supporting agencies across this state. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.50. Returning warrior special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue returning warrior special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the returning warrior special plates. The design and color of the returning warrior special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for returning warrior special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the returning warrior special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the returning warrior special plate fund established by this section. D. The returning warrior special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have started a program in 2005 to financially assist veterans who are EXPERIENCING difficulty meeting basic needs to transition back into the civilian community. 2. Provide veterans with COMMUNITY assistance. 3. Help veterans coordinate with veterans affairs facilities. 4. Support mental health initiatives for veterans. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.51. Community healthy living special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue community healthy living special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the community healthy living special plates. The design and color of the community healthy living special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for community healthy living special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the community healthy living special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the community healthy living special plate fund established by this section. D. The community healthy living special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must have: 1. a MISSION of strengthening the COMMUNITY BY connecting all PEOPLE to their potential and purpose. 2. programs for persons of every age and life stage. 3. at least fifteen centers across this state. 4. At least one center in existence for over one hundred twenty years. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.52. Historic electric vehicle special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue historic electric vehicle special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the historic electric vehicle special plates. The design and color of the historic electric vehicle special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for historic electric vehicle special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the historic electric vehicle special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the historic electric vehicle special plate fund established by this section. D. The historic electric vehicle special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have a mission to inspire a shift to sustainably powered electric transportation. 2. provide an interactive EXPERIENCE for VISITORS. 3. Showcase the history of electric vehicles through a large collection of HISTORIC electric vehicles. 4. Have been in EXISTENCE since 2014. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.53. Kindness charity special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue kindness charity special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the kindness charity special plates. The design and color of the kindness charity special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for kindness charity special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the kindness charity special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the kindness charity special plate fund established by this section. D. The kindness charity special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have Been in EXISTENCE since 2003. 2. have At least one thousand active members who volunteer with the organization. 3. have A mission to inspire people of this state to practice intentional kindness through art, education and community connection. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.54. Elk and other wildlife special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue elk and other wildlife special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the elk and other wildlife special plates. The design and color of the elk and other wildlife special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for elk and other wildlife special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the elk and other wildlife special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the elk and other wildlife special plate fund established by this section. D. The elk and other wildlife special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Engage with volunteers and contractors to maintain and restore habitat and wildlife water projects across this state. 2. Coordinate and manage youth programs, including conservation, hunting and outdoor activities. 3. Facilitate big game and other outdoor experiences for Arizona's wounded veterans. 4. Conduct outreach and cultivate partnerships to promote and advocate for public education regarding wildlife policies, biology-based habitat management and land stewardship. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.55. Youth education charity special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue youth education charity special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the youth education charity special plates. The design and color of the youth education charity special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for youth education charity special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the youth education charity special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the youth education charity special plate fund established by this section. D. The youth education charity special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in the city of scottsdale. 2. Have been incorporated in 1986. 3. consist of members who support the organization monetarily or through regular volunteer activities. 4. Provide grants to nonprofits in Maricopa county and provide scholarships, grants and programming to public education schools and students. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.56. Police service dogs special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue police service dogs special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the police service dogs special plates. The design and color of the police service dogs special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for police service dogs special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the police service dogs special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the police service dogs special plate fund established by this section. D. The police service dogs special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have a membership consisting of police service dog handlers and trainers. 2. Promote and assist in the use of police service dogs in the prevention and detection of crime. 3. Promote educational programs relating to the use of police service dogs. 4. Provide assistance to law enforcement AGENCIES that wish to IMPLEMENT police service dogs. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.57. Golf tournament charity special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. Have been established after 1966. 2. Oversee the OPERATIONS and sales arm of a professional golfers' association tour event. 3. Be COMPRISED of over fifty active business and PROFESSIONAL members. 4. Promote and fund local youth ATHLETIC programs in the TUCSON area. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.58. Distracted driving special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. Have a mission of raising awareness about the dangers of distracted driving. 2. Have a goal of educating, empowering and protecting drivers, passengers and PEDESTRIANS by PROMOTING focused and responsible driving habits. 3. Conduct community outreach and public campaigns and provide PROGRAMS to reduce traffic accidents caused by cell phones, fatigue and other distractions while driving. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.59. Public education foundation special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. shine a spotlight on the work and EDUCATION of public school EDUCATORS, staff and administrators through programs including the A+ school of excellence and teacher of the year. 2. Support pathways to EXCELLENCE with ACADEMIC programs for students and training for teachers and ADMINISTRATORS through programs, including support for the spelling bee, science, technology, engineering and MATHEMATICS teachers and leadership programs for principals. 3. Have a belief that public education is a great equalizer that gives all students the chance at a high-quality education and SUCCESSFUL future. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.60. Grand Canyon national park special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue Grand Canyon national park special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the Grand Canyon national park special plates. The design and color of the Grand Canyon national park special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for Grand Canyon national park special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the Grand Canyon national park special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the Grand Canyon national park special plate fund established by this section. D. The Grand Canyon national park special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state. 2. Have operated in this state for over twenty consecutive years. 3. Be an OFFICIAL philanthropic partner of the Grand Canyon national park. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 28-2472, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2472. Congressional medal of honor license plates A. The department shall issue at no additional cost not more than three distinctive license plates to a person the registered owner of a personal motor vehicle who submits proof to the department that the person registered owner of the personal motor vehicle is a recipient of the bona fide congressional medal of honor recipient. B. NOtwithstanding section 28-2003, the department may not collect any registration fee for each original or any renewal of license plate issued pursuant to this section.END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Title 28, chapter 7, article 13, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 28-2477 and 28-2478, to read: START_STATUTE28-2477. Bronze star medal license plates; fees A. From and after December 31, 2026, The department shall issue distinctive license plates to: 1. A person who submits satisfactory proof to the department that the person is a veteran and a bona fide bronze star medal recipient. 2. An immediate family member of a person who has been issued a license plate pursuant to this section. b. For each original license plate issued pursuant to this section, the department shall collect a fee of $25 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. For each annual renewal of license plates issued pursuant to this section, the department shall charge a fee of $5 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the $25 fee as a donation in the veterans' donations fund established by section 41-608. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2478. Silver star medal license plates; fees A. From and after December 31, 2026, The department shall issue distinctive license plates to: 1. A person who submits satisfactory proof to the department that the person is a veteran and a bona fide Silver star medal recipient. 2. An immediate family member of a person who has been issued a license plate pursuant to this section. b. For each original license plate issued pursuant to this section, the department shall collect a fee of $25 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. For each annual renewal of license plates issued pursuant to this section, the department shall charge a fee of $5 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003.  The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the $25 fee as a donation in the veterans' donations fund established by section 41-608.END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 28-3158, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3158. Driver license or instruction permit application A. A person who applies for an instruction permit or for a driver license shall use a form furnished by the department. B. An applicant shall pay the fee prescribed by section 28-3002 for a driver license or for an instruction permit issued under section 28-3154, 28-3155, 28-3156 or 28-3225. The department shall refund an application fee pursuant to section 28-373. C. An applicant for an instruction permit or a driver license shall give the department satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, sex and domicile residence address in this state, if the applicant has a residence address, and that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. D. The application for an instruction permit or a driver license shall state the following: 1. A brief description of the applicant and any other identifying information required by the department. 2. Whether the applicant has been licensed, and if so, the type of license issued, when the license was issued and what state or country issued the license. 3. If the applicant was never licensed, the applicant's last previous state or country of residence. 4. The social security number of the applicant. 5. Other information required by the department. E. The department shall: 1. Verify that a social security number provided by an applicant is a valid number assigned to that applicant. 2. Retain the social security number in its records. F. The social security number provided to the department pursuant to subsection D of this section for an applicant's driver license or instruction permit shall not appear on an applicant's driver license or instruction permit unless the applicant requests that the social security number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number. Except as provided in sections 28-455 and 41-1954, the department shall not release the social security number to any person unless the applicant requests that the social security number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number. The provisions of this subsection shall be included in each application. G. The department may adopt and implement procedures to deny a driver license or instruction permit to a person who has been deported. The department may adopt and implement procedures to reinstate a person's privilege to apply for a driver license or permit if the person's legal presence status is restored. H. On request of an applicant, the department shall allow the applicant to provide on the license or permit a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant. I. The department may request an applicant who appears in person for a license, a duplicate license or reinstatement of a driving privilege to complete satisfactorily the vision screening prescribed by the department. J. If a driver license applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, on request of the applicant, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the license that identifies the person as a veteran. END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Section 28-3165, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3165. Nonoperating identification license; immunity; rules; emancipated minors; definition A. On receipt of an application from a person who does not have a valid driver license issued by this state or whose driving privilege is suspended, the department shall issue a nonoperating identification license that contains a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the full legal name, the date of birth, the residence address and a brief description of the licensee and either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space on which the licensee is required to write the licensee's usual signature with pen and ink. A nonoperating identification license that is issued to a person whose driving privilege is suspended shall not be valid for more than one hundred eighty days from the date of issuance. B. On request of an applicant: 1. The department shall allow the applicant to provide on the nonoperating identification license a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant. 2. If the applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the nonoperating identification license that identifies that person as a veteran. 3. If the applicant elects to show and submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the nonoperating identification license that identifies the applicant as a native American. The distinguishing mark may not identify a specific Indian tribe or other specific personal information that is submitted on the documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state. Documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state include: (a) An enhanced tribal card. (b) A tribal identification card. (c) A tribal certificate of Indian blood. (d) A tribal or bureau of Indian affairs affidavit of birth. C. A person who is issued a license pursuant to this section shall use it only for identification purposes of the licensee. The nonoperating identification license does not grant authority to operate a motor vehicle in this state. The department shall clearly label the nonoperating identification license "for identification only, not for operation of a motor vehicle". D. On issuance of a driver license, the holder of a nonoperating identification license shall surrender the nonoperating identification license to the department, and the department shall not refund any fee paid for the issuance of the nonoperating identification license. E. A nonoperating identification license shall contain the photograph of the licensee. When issuing a nonoperating identification license, the department shall use a process that prohibits as nearly as possible the ability to superimpose a photograph on the license without ready detection. The department shall process nonoperating identification licenses and photo attachments in color. F. On application, an applicant shall give the department satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, sex and residence address, if the applicant has a residence address, and that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. The application shall briefly describe the applicant, state whether the applicant has been licensed, and if so, the type of license issued, when and by what state or country and whether any such license is under suspension, revocation or cancellation. The application shall contain other identifying information required by the department. As necessary, the department may require other identifying information from the applicant. G. The department may adopt and implement procedures to deny a nonoperating identification license to a person who has been deported. The department may adopt and implement procedures to reinstate a person's privilege to apply for a nonoperating identification license if the person's legal presence status is restored. H. A nonoperating identification license issued by the department is solely for the use and convenience of the applicant for identification purposes. I. The department shall adopt rules and establish fees for issuance of a nonoperating identification license, except that the department shall not require an examination. J. The fees established pursuant to this section do not apply to any of the following: 1. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older. 2. A person who is a recipient of public monies as an individual with a disability under title XVI of the social security act, as amended. 3. A veteran who does not have a residence address. 4. A veteran whose residence address is the address of a shelter that provides services to the homeless. 5. A child who is in the custody of the department of child safety. K. If a person qualifies for a nonoperating identification license and is under the legal drinking age, the department shall issue a license that is marked by color, code or design to immediately distinguish it from a nonoperating identification license issued to a person of legal drinking age. The department shall indicate on the nonoperating identification license issued pursuant to this subsection the year in which the person will attain the legal drinking age. L. If a minor has been emancipated pursuant to title 12, chapter 15, on application and proof of emancipation, the department shall issue a nonoperating identification license that contains the words "emancipated minor". M. Notwithstanding any other law, if an applicant for a nonoperating identification license is at least sixteen years of age and either does not have a residence address or is in the department of child safety's custody, the applicant does not need a signature of the applicant's parent, guardian, foster parent or employer. N. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-601. END_STATUTE Sec. 12. Section 28-3173, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3173. License update A. By written notice the department shall require a licensee to update the licensee's photograph or present or mail to the department in a form prescribed by the department a report based on a vision test performed by the department or an examination by an optometrist or an ophthalmologist or physician licensed to practice medicine, if the license has not been updated in the preceding twelve sixteen years. B. The director may require a licensee to update the licensee's license at any time during the twelve year sixteen-year period from the date of issuance. END_STATUTE Sec. 13. Section 28-3319, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3319. Action after license suspension, revocation or denial for driving under the influence or refusal of test; ignition interlock device requirement; definitions A. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, the license of a driver or the driving privilege of a nonresident is suspended or revoked, the department shall not terminate the suspension or revocation or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. B. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, an unlicensed resident is denied a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle, the department shall not issue a license or permit until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. C. If a person whose license or driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385 is ordered, pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385, to attend alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment or evidence-based psychotherapy, the department shall not either: 1. Terminate the suspension or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is participating satisfactorily in alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment or evidence-based psychotherapy. 2. Issue a new license or a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title to operate a motor vehicle after the revocation until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is SATISFACTORILY participating in the court-ordered program. D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, on receipt of a report of conviction from a court for a violation that involved intoxicating liquor or that specifically requires the installation of a certified ignition interlock device, the department shall require any motor vehicle the convicted person operates to be equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device and the convicted person to meet the requirements prescribed in section 28-1461 as follows: 1. For twelve months if: (a) Except as provided in subsection G H of this section, the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 or section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 3, subdivision (a). (b) The department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of section 28-1381 or section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 with a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. 2. For eighteen months if the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2. 3. For twenty-four months if: (a) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2 and the department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person has a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. (b) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 1, 2, 4 or 5 or paragraph 3, subdivision (b). E. If a person is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to subsection D of this section and the person has a medical condition that prevents the person from using the certified ignition interlock device during the entire time period required by subsection D of this section, the department of transportation shall require monthly alcohol and drug screening instead of the certified ignition interlock device for the time period prescribed by subsection D of this section. The department of transportation shall require evidence of the medical condition that is satisfactory to the department of TRANSPORTATION and in a manner prescribed by the department of transportation from an authorized physician as defined in section 28-2409 or an authorized physician assistant as defined in section 28-2409.  The alcohol or drug screening shall be provided by a facility approved by the department of health services, the United States department of veterans affairs, a substance abuse counselor as defined in section 28-3005 or a probation department. F. The requirement prescribed in subsection D of this section begins on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or EVIDENCE-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. If the person is issued a special ignition interlock restricted driver license for the violations giving rise to the requirements prescribed in subsection D of this section or pursuant to section 28-1321, subsection P or section 28-1385, subsection J, the person shall be credited for the amount of time that a certified ignition interlock device is installed on the person's motor vehicle after the department authorizes the installation of the certified ignition interlock device on that person's motor vehicle. G. A person who is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section shall comply with chapter 4, article 5 of this title. H. The department shall defer the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section commencing with the later of six months from the date the interlock was installed or the completion of the requirements of this subsection if all of the following apply: 1. The person is sentenced pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection I. 2. The person successfully completes an alcohol education program consisting of at least sixteen hours pursuant to section 28-1381. 3. The person has maintained a functioning ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles the person operates and has met the requirements of section 28-1461. 4. The person has not attempted to operate a vehicle with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more two or more times during the period of license restriction or limitation. 5. At the time of the offense, the person was not involved in a motor vehicle accident that resulted in physical injury or property damage. 6. All necessary compliance information has been provided to the department by the ignition interlock device provider, the alcohol screening program and the alcohol education program. I. The deferment pursuant to subsection H of this section is permanent, unless the person is arrested for a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 that occurs during the period of the deferment. If the person is arrested as described in this subsection, the department shall revoke the deferment and require the person to complete the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section. J. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall reduce the length of time that a person is required to have a functioning certified ignition interlock device installed in a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection D of this section by the length of time that the person is incarcerated in a jail or prison facility for a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1383 that did not involve intoxicating liquor. K. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Certified ignition interlock device" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1301. 2. "evidence-based PSYCHOTHERAPY" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1381. END_STATUTE Sec. 14. Section 28-3321, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3321. Moving violations by persons under eighteen years of age; traffic survival school; suspension A person who holds a driver permit or license and who is found responsible for a moving civil traffic violation pursuant to this title or who is convicted of a moving criminal traffic offense pursuant to this title, excluding violations of sections 28-693, 28-695, 28-708, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 and 28-3174, and who commits the moving civil traffic violation or moving criminal traffic offense while the person is under eighteen years of age is subject to the following: 1. On receipt of the first record of judgment or conviction, the department shall order the person to attend and successfully complete traffic survival school educational sessions. 2. On receipt of the second record of judgment or conviction, the department shall suspend the person's driving privilege for three months. 3. On receipt of the third record of judgment or conviction, the department shall suspend the person's driving privilege for six months.END_STATUTE Sec. 15. Section 28-4882, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-4882. Junk vehicle; disposition A. If a vehicle has been reported abandoned under section 28-4838, the person making the report may request that the vehicle be processed as a junk vehicle. An agent of the department shall inspect the vehicle to determine if the vehicle is a junk vehicle. B. On making a determination that the vehicle is a junk vehicle, the director shall cause a search of department records to be made, or if a junk vehicle is registered in another state, make inquiry of the vehicle registration agency in that state, to ascertain the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person identified on the department's record. C. On receipt of information disclosing the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person identified on the department's record who may have an interest in the vehicle, the director shall give notice to all interested persons of the director's intention to allow the disposition of the junk vehicle as prescribed by this section. The director shall give the notice by mail within five days for a vehicle with a record in this state or within thirty days for all other vehicles. D. If the records of the department or out of state jurisdiction do not disclose the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person who is identified on the department's record and who may have an interest in the vehicle, or if the notice is returned marked unclaimed or addressee unknown, the department shall publish the notice of the intention of the director to allow the disposition of the junk vehicle as prescribed by this article once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the junk vehicle was found on the department's website for at least thirty days. The published notice shall include a statement that the department will make available to the public a complete vehicle description of junk vehicles. E. If the vehicle is unclaimed at the expiration of thirty days after the date placed on the notification mailed by the department or within ten days of the publication as provided in subsections C and D of this section, the director shall determine if the vehicle is a stolen vehicle. On receiving notification that the vehicle has not been reported stolen, the director shall issue written authorization to the owner of the property authorizing the owner of the property or a licensed automotive recycler to dispose of the junk vehicle pursuant to section 28-4883.END_STATUTE Sec. 16. Section 28-5606, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5606. Imposition of motor fuel taxes A. In addition to all other taxes provided by law, a tax of eighteen cents $.18 per gallon is imposed on motor vehicle fuel possessed, used or consumed in this state. B. To partially compensate this state for the use of its highways: 1. A use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a light class motor vehicle on a highway in this state at the same rate per gallon as the motor vehicle fuel tax prescribed in subsection A of this section, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels. 2. A use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a use class motor vehicle on a highway in this state at the rate of twenty-six cents $.26 for each gallon, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels and use class vehicles that are exempt pursuant to section 28-5432 from the weight fee prescribed in section 28-5433 are subject to the use fuel tax imposed by paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. Through December 31, 2024, a use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a motor vehicle transporting forest products in compliance with the requirements of section 41-1516 on a highway in this state at the rate of nine cents for each gallon, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels. C. The motor vehicle fuel and use fuel taxes imposed pursuant to this section and the aviation fuel taxes imposed pursuant to section 28-8344 are conclusively presumed to be direct taxes on the consumer or user but shall be collected and remitted to the department by suppliers for the purpose of convenience and facility only. Motor vehicle fuel, use fuel and aviation fuel taxes that are collected and paid to the department by a supplier are considered to be advance payments, shall be added to the price of motor vehicle fuel, use fuel or aviation fuel and shall be recovered from the consumer or user. D. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel taxes imposed pursuant to this section on the use of motor vehicle fuel and use fuel and the aviation fuel taxes imposed pursuant to section 28-8344 on the use of aviation fuel, other than by bulk transfer, arise at the time the motor vehicle, use or aviation fuel either: 1. Is imported into this state and is measured by invoiced gallons received outside this state at a refinery, terminal or bulk plant for delivery to a destination in this state. 2. Is removed, as measured by invoiced gallons, from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal in this state. 3. Is removed, as measured by invoiced gallons, from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal or refinery outside this state for delivery to a destination in this state as represented on the shipping papers if a supplier imports the motor vehicle, use or aviation fuel for the account of the supplier or the supplier has made a tax precollection election pursuant to section 28-5636. E. If motor fuel is removed from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal or is imported into this state, the original removal, transfer or importation of the motor fuel is subject to the collection of the tax. If this motor fuel is transported to another qualified terminal or reenters the bulk transfer terminal system, the subsequent sale of the motor fuel on which tax has been collected is not subject to collection of an additional tax if proper documentation is retained to support the transaction. END_STATUTE Sec. 17. Section 28-5614, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5614. Refunds; use fuel A. If a vendor pays the use fuel tax rate for use class motor vehicles on use fuel that is actually used in the propulsion of a light class motor vehicle on a highway in this state or that is actually used in the propulsion of a use class motor vehicle that is exempt pursuant to section 28-5432 from the weight fee prescribed in section 28-5433 on a highway in this state and for the purpose of convenience and facility only, the vendor may apply to the department for a refund of the difference between the amount of the use class motor vehicle use fuel tax paid and the amount of the light class motor vehicle use fuel tax on the same number of gallons purchased. B. If a person who transports forest products on a highway in this state in compliance with the requirements of section 41-1516 pays the use fuel tax rate prescribed in section 28-5606, subsection B, paragraph 2 for a use class motor vehicle that is eligible for the use fuel tax rate prescribed in section 28-5606, subsection B, paragraph 3, the person may apply to the department for a refund of the difference between the amount of the use fuel tax paid and the use fuel tax rate prescribed for a motor vehicle transporting forest products. C. B. The director may prescribe any forms the director deems necessary to implement this section. D. C. A vendor may file an application for a refund pursuant to this section on a monthly basis subject to the limitations prescribed in section 28-5612. E. D. The director shall: 1. Pay the refund from current use fuel tax receipts. 2. Deduct the refund from the monthly use fuel tax receipts before the deposit pursuant to section 28-5730 is made. END_STATUTE Sec. 18. Section 28-5805, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5805. Motor vehicle powered by alternative fuel; classification; vehicle license tax; definitions A. A separate classification of motor vehicles is established for purposes of taxation pursuant to article IX, section 11, Constitution of Arizona, that consists of motor vehicles that are powered by alternative fuel and for which the department issues an alternative fuel vehicle special plate or sticker pursuant to section 28-2416. B. Notwithstanding section 28-5801, the registering officer shall collect at the time of application for and before registration of the motor vehicle that is classified under this section an annual license tax of $4 for each $100 in value. The motor vehicle value is determined as follows: 1. For a motor vehicle that is registered in this state before January 1, 2022, the value of the motor vehicle is one percent of the manufacturer's base retail price of the motor vehicle. After the first twelve months of the life of the motor vehicle as determined by its initial registration, the value of the motor vehicle is fifteen percent less for each twelve-month period than the value for the preceding twelve-month period. 2. For a motor vehicle that is initially registered in this state during a period beginning January 1, 2022 and ending December 31, 2022, during the first twelve months of the life of the motor vehicle as determined by its initial registration, the value of the motor vehicle is twenty percent of the manufacturer's base retail price of the motor vehicle. During each succeeding twelve-month period, the value of the motor vehicle is fifteen percent less than the value for the preceding twelve-month period. C. The registering officer shall collect the vehicle license tax on a motor vehicle that is powered by alternative fuel and that is initially registered from and after December 31, 2022 in accordance with section 28-5801. The minimum amount of the vehicle license tax collected pursuant to this subsection must be in accordance with section 28-5801 and shall be distributed pursuant to section 28-5808, subsection B. D. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the minimum amount of the license tax computed under this section is $5 per year for each motor vehicle subject to the tax. E. Except as specifically provided in this section, the vehicle license tax on a motor vehicle classified under this section is governed by this article. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Alternative fuel" has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-215. 2. "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that meets the safety standards of the national highway traffic safety administration and includes: (a) Neighborhood electric vehicles that meet the standards prescribed in 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.500, except that, if a vehicle is designed to be operated at speeds of twenty miles per hour or less, the vehicle is not required to have a seventeen digit vehicle identification number. (b) Neighborhood electric shuttles. END_STATUTE Sec. 19. Section 28-6501, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6501. Definition of highway user revenues In this article, unless the context otherwise requires or except as otherwise provided by statute, "highway user revenues" means all monies received in this state from licenses, taxes, penalties, interest and fees authorized by the following: 1. Chapters 2, 7, 8 and 15 of this title, except for: (a) The special plate administration fees prescribed in sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60 and 28-2514. (b) The donations prescribed in sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2415, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, and 28-2476, 28-2477 and 28-2478. 2. Section 28-1177. 3. Chapters 10 and 11 of this title. 4. Chapter 16, articles 1, 2 and 4 of this title, except as provided in sections 28-5926 and 28-5927.END_STATUTE Sec. 20. Section 28-6991, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6991. State highway fund; sources The state highway fund is established that consists of: 1. Monies distributed from the Arizona highway user revenue fund pursuant to chapter 18 of this title. 2. Monies appropriated by the legislature. 3. Monies received from donations for the construction, improvement or maintenance of state highways or bridges. These monies shall be credited to a special account and shall be spent only for the purpose indicated by the donor. 4. Monies received from counties or cities under cooperative agreements, including proceeds from bond issues. The state treasurer shall deposit these monies to the credit of the fund in a special account on delivery to the treasurer of a concise written agreement between the department and the county or city stating the purposes for which the monies are surrendered by the county or city, and these monies shall be spent only as stated in the agreement. 5. Monies received from the United States under an act of Congress to provide aid for the construction of rural post roads, but monies received on projects for which the monies necessary to be provided by this state are wholly derived from sources mentioned in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this section shall be allotted by the department and deposited by the state treasurer in the special account within the fund established for each project. On completion of the project, on the satisfaction and discharge in full of all obligations of any kind created and on request of the department, the treasurer shall transfer the unexpended balance in the special account for the project into the state highway fund, and the unexpended balance and any further federal aid thereafter received on account of the project may be spent under the general provisions of this title. 6. Monies in the custody of an officer or agent of this state from any source that is to be used for the construction, improvement or maintenance of state highways or bridges. 7. Monies deposited in the state general fund and arising from the disposal of state personal property belonging to the department. 8. Receipts from the sale or disposal of any or all other property held by the department and purchased with state highway monies. 9. Monies generated pursuant to section 28-410. 10. Monies distributed pursuant to section 28-5808, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (d). 11. Monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-1143, 28-2353 and 28-3003. 12. Except as provided in section 28-5101, the following monies: (a) Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2206 and section 28-5808, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (e). (b) $1 of each registration fee and $1 of each title fee collected pursuant to section 28-2003. (c) $2 of each late registration penalty collected by the director pursuant to section 28-2162. (d) The air quality compliance fee collected pursuant to section 49-542. (e) The special plate administration fees collected pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60 and 28-2514. (f) Monies collected pursuant to sections 28-372, 28-2155 and 28-2156 if the director is the registering officer. 13. Monies deposited pursuant to chapter 5, article 5 of this title. 14. Donations received pursuant to section 28-2269. 15. Dealer and registration monies collected pursuant to section 28-4304. 16. Abandoned vehicle administration monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4804. 17. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-710, subsection D, paragraph 2. 18. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2065. 19. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7311. 20. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7059. 21. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-1105. 22. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2448, subsection D. 23. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3415. 24. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3002, subsection A, paragraph 14. 25. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7316. 26. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4302. 27. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3416. 28. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4504. 29. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2098. 30. Monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2321, 28-2324, 28-2325, 28-5474, 28-5739, 28-5863 and 28-5864.END_STATUTE Sec. 21. Section 28-6993, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6993. State highway fund; authorized uses A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and section 28-6538, the state highway fund shall be used for any of the following purposes in strict conformity with and subject to the budget as provided by this section and by sections 28-6997 through 28-7003: 1. To pay salaries, wages, necessary travel expenses and other expenses of officers and employees of the department and the incidental office expenses, including telegraph, telephone, postal and express charges and printing, stationery and advertising expenses. 2. To pay for both: (a) Equipment, supplies, machines, tools, department offices and laboratories established by the department. (b) The construction and repair of buildings or yards of the department. 3. To pay the cost of both: (a) Engineering, construction, improvement and maintenance of state highways and parts of highways forming state routes. (b) Highways under cooperative agreements with the United States that are entered into pursuant to this chapter and an act of Congress providing for the construction of rural post roads. 4. To pay land damages incurred by reason of establishing, opening, altering, relocating, widening or abandoning portions of a state route or state highway. 5. To reimburse the department revolving account. 6. To pay premiums on authorized indemnity bonds and on compensation insurance under the workers' compensation act. 7. To defray lawful expenses and costs required to administer and carry out the intent, purposes and provisions of this title, including repayment of obligations entered into pursuant to this title, payment of interest on obligations entered into pursuant to this title, repayment of loans and other financial assistance, including repayment of advances and interest on advances made to the department pursuant to section 28-7677, and payment of all other obligations and expenses of the board and department pursuant to chapter 21 of this title. 8. To pay lawful bills and charges incurred by the state engineer. 9. To acquire, construct or improve entry roads to state parks or roads within state parks. 10. To acquire, construct or improve entry roads to state prisons. 11. To pay the cost of relocating a utility facility pursuant to section 28-7156. 12. For the purposes provided in subsections C, D and E of this section and sections 28-1143, 28-2353 and 28-3003. 13. To pay the cost of issuing an Arizona centennial special plate pursuant to section 28-2448. 14. To pay for all of the following: (a) The enforcement by the department of public safety and the department of transportation of vehicle safety requirements within twenty-five miles of the border between this state and Mexico. (b) Costs related to procuring electronic equipment, automated systems or improvements to existing electronic equipment or automated systems for relieving vehicle congestion at ports of entry on the border between this state and Mexico. (c) Constructing, maintaining and upgrading transportation facilities, including roads, streets and highways, approved by the board within twenty-five miles of the border between this state and Mexico. (d) As approved by the board, constructing and maintaining transportation facilities in the CANAMEX high priority corridor as defined in section 332 of the national highway system designation act of 1995 (P.L. 104-59; 109 Stat. 568). (e) Activities of the department that include collecting transportation and trade data in the United States and Mexico for the purposes of constructing transportation facilities, improving public safety, improving truck processing time and relieving congestion at ports of entry on the border between this state and Mexico. The department may enter into an agreement with the Arizona-Mexico commission and provide funding to the commission for the purposes of this subdivision. (f) A commitment or investment necessary for the department or another agency of this state to obtain federal monies that are designated for expenditure pursuant to this section. B. For each fiscal year, the department of transportation shall allocate and transfer monies in the state highway fund to the department of public safety for funding a portion of highway patrol costs in eight installments in each of the first eight months of a fiscal year that do not exceed $10,000,000. C. Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may use the monies in the state highway fund as prescribed in section 28-6991, paragraph 12 to carry out the duties imposed by this title for registration or titling of vehicles, to operate joint title, registration and driver licensing offices, to cover the administrative costs of issuing the air quality compliance sticker, modifying the year validating tab and issuing the windshield sticker and to cover expenses and costs in issuing special plates pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.60 and 28-2514. D. The department shall use monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to chapter 5, article 5 of this title only as prescribed by that article. E. Monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-2269 shall be used only as prescribed by that section. F. Monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-710, subsection D, paragraph 2 shall only be used for state highway work zone traffic control devices. G. The department may exchange monies distributed to the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-6538, subsection A, paragraph 1 for local government surface transportation program federal monies suballocated to councils of government and metropolitan planning organizations if the local government scheduled to receive the federal monies concurs. An exchange of state highway fund monies pursuant to this subsection shall be in an amount that is at least equal to ninety percent of the federal obligation authority that exists in the project for which the exchange is proposed. H. The department shall use monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-1105, subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a) only for a transportation facility that is located within twenty drivable miles of the international port of entry and shall spend the monies proportionally based on the amount of total monies collected pursuant to section 28-1105, subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). For the purposes of this subsection, "transportation facility" means a highway or a state route or a county, city or town road that is used by a commercial vehicle or a commercial vehicle combination for which an axle fee is paid pursuant to section 28-5474.END_STATUTE Sec. 22. Section 28-7041, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-7041. State highways and routes defined; primitive road designation A. The state highways, to be known as state routes, consist of the highways declared before August 12, 1927 to be state highways, under authority of law, that the board, after receipt of a recommendation from the director, may add to, abandon or change. If the board proceeds contrary to the recommendations of the director, it the board shall file a written report with the governor stating the reasons for the action. B. The state highways consist of the parts of the state routes designated and accepted as state highways by the board. A highway that has not been designated as a state route shall not become a state highway and any portion of a state route shall not become a state highway until it has been specifically designated and accepted by the board as a state highway and ordered to be constructed and improved. C. The director or the director's designee may designate a state highway or route as a PRIMITIVE ROAD. D. Neither this state or its employees are liable for damages or injuries resulting from the use of a primitive road designated pursuant to subsection C of this section except for intentional injuries or gross negligence caused by an employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment. E. The department shall place signs on each road designated as a primitive road in locations adequate to warn the public. These signs shall state "Primitive road, caution, use at your own risk. This surface is not regularly maintained". C. F. All highways, roads or streets that have been constructed, laid out, opened, established or maintained for ten years or more by the state or an agency or political subdivision of the state before January 1, 1960 and that have been used continuously by the public as thoroughfares for free travel and passage for ten years or more are declared public highways, regardless of an error, defect or omission in the proceeding or failure to act to establish those highways, roads or streets or in recording the proceedings. END_STATUTE Sec. 23. Section 28-8328, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-8328. Failure to register; assessment procedure If an aircraft is not registered within the time periods prescribed in this article, the director shall assess registration fees, license taxes and penalties due as follows: 1. The director shall give written notice of the assessment to the owner of the aircraft by either mailing the notice in a postage prepaid sealed envelope addressed to the owner of the aircraft at the owner's address as it appears in the records of the department or by delivery in person. Notice is deemed to be complete at the time of mailing or at the time of personal delivery electronic transmission. 2. The assessment is final thirty days after notice is deemed to be complete, unless, before that time, the department receives a written objection to the assessment and a request for a hearing from the owner. If the department receives a request for a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 28-8244. END_STATUTE Sec. 24. Section 41-608, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-608. Veterans' donations fund; transfer; grants A. The veterans' donations fund is established consisting of monies, gifts and contributions donated to the department and monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2414, 28-2428, 28-2431, 28-2447, 28-2454, 28-2470.10, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, 28-2476, 28-2477, 28-2478 and 43-620. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. The monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. The department shall annually transfer fifteen percent of all revenues received by the department that are deposited in the veterans' donations fund pursuant to this section to the subaccount established pursuant to section 41-608.01 in the state homes for veterans trust fund. The department shall adopt rules or policies for grants of less than $5,000 that encourage as much competition as practicable. B. The director or the director's designee may solicit and receive donations, including in-kind donations, from the public for veterans. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the monetary donations in the veterans' donations fund. Monies in the fund are subject to state auditing procedures. Except for monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2431 and 28-2447, the donations may be used for the benefit of the veterans within this state as grants, subject to chapter 24 of this title, if applicable. C. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2431, subsection C. The monies in the subaccount shall be used for the construction and maintenance of the enduring freedom memorial authorized pursuant to section 41-1363 for placement in Wesley Bolin Plaza. D. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2447, subsection F. The monies in the subaccount shall be used for the benefit of women veterans in this state, including providing shelter to homeless women veterans as grants, subject to chapter 24 of this title, if applicable. E. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2454, subsection C. The first $32,000 in the subaccount shall be reimbursed to the person that provides the $32,000 pursuant to section 28-2454, subsection A. The director shall annually allocate monies from the subaccount to a foundation that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes and that is the nation's oldest and largest provider of need-based scholarships to children of United States military members. The foundation must: 1. Have been in existence for at least fifty-two years. 2. Have provided more than thirty-three thousand scholarships that are valued at almost $90,000,000. 3. Have a mission that includes honoring marines and educating their children. 4. Award scholarship monies to children of marines and navy corpsmen who were killed or wounded in combat or who have demonstrated financial need. F. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2470.10, subsection C. The first $32,000 in the subaccount shall be reimbursed to the person that provides the $32,000 pursuant to section 28-2470.10, subsection A. The director shall annually allocate monies from the subaccount to a foundation that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The foundation must: 1. Have been in existence for at least twenty years. 2. Have a mission that includes providing college scholarships to: (a) The sons and daughters of those who have served the United States honorably as soldiers in the United States army. (b) The spouses of enlisted soldiers on active duty in the United States army. 3. Envision increasing its fundraising and visibility to encourage more applicants to apply for scholarships and to provide larger scholarships to an increasing number of deserving applicants to both: (a) Reward army families for the sacrifices that army soldiers make every day to serve their nation. (b) Help the spouses and children of army soldiers become leaders in society. 4. Award scholarship monies to: (a) Children of former United States army members who were killed while serving in the United States army or who received an honorable discharge or medical discharge. (b) Children of United States army members in good standing serving in regular active duty, active duty reserve or active duty national guard. (c) Spouses of United States army members in good standing serving in regular active duty, active duty reserve or active duty national guard. G. The director shall inventory and account for the use of any tangible personal property donated to the fund. H. The department may use up to $150,000 from the veterans' donations fund each fiscal year to administer this section. In addition to any other full-time equivalent positions authorized by law, the department is authorized two full-time equivalent positions to administer this section. I. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE Sec. 25. Heading change The chapter heading of title 44, chapter 38, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "BUSINESSES EXEMPT FROM MASK MANDATE" to "BUSINESSES GENERALLY". Sec. 26. Title 44, chapter 38, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-7953, to read: START_STATUTE44-7953. Businesses that use camera systems; contract requirements; data collection A contract between a law enforcement agency and a business that uses a camera system that has the sole purpose of identifying motor vehicles must include a provision that prohibits the business from selling or disseminating to third parties any data collected by the camera system.END_STATUTE Sec. 27. Implementation The department of transportation shall recall the honorary consular official special plates issued pursuant to section 28-2410, Arizona Revised Statutes, as repealed by this act, and shall issue each person a standard license plate in lieu of the honorary consular official special plate. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.